xfst-code/ot-ft/ot-ft.xfst
# OT-FT.XFST
# XFST Code for Samoan primary stress in monomorphemes, using feet, Karttunen OT
# Time-stamp: <2016-03-18 12:08:29 amoebe>

# Run input file to generate all possible stress patterns over heavy
# and light syllables (P=primary, S=secondary, W = unstressed)

echo << Generating language of input strings >> 

source ../auxiliary/gen.xfst

############################
## DEFINE FOOT PARSING ##
############################

echo << Parsing language of input strings into feet >> 

# Allow any W to be unparsed, mark as X

define MarkUnparsed [ "W" (->) "X" ];

# Try:
# define XGen Gen .o. MarkUnparsed;

# push XGen;
# down L;
# down LL;
# down HH;

define Heavy [ "[" "H" "]" ];
define Light [ "[" "L" "]" ];

# "Wrap parentheses around a non-empty sequence of parsed syllables"

define FtParse [ [ \"X" [ Heavy | Light ] ]+ -> "(" ... ")" ];

#Try:
# push FtParse;
# down "S[L]W[L]";
# down "X[L]S[L]W[L]";
# down "S[L]X[H]W[L]";
# down "S[H]X[H]W[L]";
# down "S[H]X[H]W[L]S[H]";

# Generate input strings of syllables marked with degree of stress and weight

define GenFt [ Gen .o. MarkUnparsed .o. FtParse] ;

# Try:
#push GenFt;
#down LL;


###############################
###############################
#### DEFINE CONSTRAINTS ####
###############################
###############################

echo << Define Culminativity >> 

###############################
#### DEFINE CULMINATIVITY ####
###############################

# Allow only strings containing exactly one P

define Culminativity [ $.P ];

# Try:
# push Culminativity;
# down "P[L]S[L]P[L]";
# down "P[L]S[L]";
# down "S[L]S[L]";

###############################
#### DEFINE FOOT BINARITY ####
###############################

echo << Define FootBinarity >> 

# FootBinarity
# Definition in Zuraw et al. 2014: A foot must contain exactly two
# moras.
# Here: parentheses may include either exactly one H, or exactly two Ls
# Note: this does not say that a sequence of exactly two moras must
# form a foot.

# Restrict a foot (span between parentheses) to contain exactly one
# heavy syllable, preceded by degree of stress symbol, any stress is
# okay, except X which is parsed
# These constraints only accept a single foot, we'll later express a
# restriction for the input string by concatenating these restricted
# feet

define FtBinH [ "(" \"X" Heavy ")" ];

# Try:
# push FtBinH;
# down "(S[H])";
# down "(W[H])";
# down "(X[H])";
# down "(S[H])(S[H])";
# down "(S[H]S[H])";
# down "(S[H]W[H])";
# down "(S[H]W[L])";
# down "(W[H]S[H])";
# down "(W[H])(S[H])";
# down "((((S[H])";

# Restrict material between two parentheses to contain exactly two light syllables, and no other syllables
# Cannot contain X[L];

define FtBinLL [ "(" [ \"X" Light]^2 ")" ];

# push FtBinLL;
# down "(S[H])";
# down "(S[L])";
# down "(S[L]W[H])";
# down "(S[L]W[L])";
# down "(P[L]W[L])";
# down "(W[L]W[L])";
# down "(X[L]W[L])";
# down "(W[L]S[L])";
# down "(S[L]S[L])";
# down "(S[L]X[L])";
# down "X[L](W[H]W[H])";
# down "X[L](W[L]W[L])";
# down "(S[L]W[L]W[L])";
# down "(S[L]W[L]W[H])";
# down "(S[L]W[L])(S[L]W[L])";
# down "(S[L]W[L])X[H](W[H]W[H])";

# Now allow a string to include a string of H or LL feet, with
# unparsed syllables interspersed.

define Unparsed [ "X" "[" ? "]" ];

define FtBin [ FtBinH | FtBinLL | Unparsed ]*;

# Try:
# push FtBin;
# down "X[H]";
# down "S[H]";
# down "W[L]H[L]";
# down "(S[H])";
# down "(W[H])";
# down "(X[H])";
# down "(T[H])";
# down "X[L](S[H])";
# down "X[H](S[H])";
# down "(S[H]W[L])";
# down "(W[H]W[H])";
# down "(S[L]W[L])";
# down "(S[L]W[L]W[L])";
# down "(W[L]W[L]W[L])";
# down "(S[H]S[H])";
# down "(S[H])(S[H])";
# down "(W[H])(S[H])";
# down "(W[H])(S[H])X[L]";
# down "(W[H])(S[H])X[H]";
# down "X[H](W[H])(S[H])";
# down "(S[L]W[L])X[H]";
# down "(W[H])(W[H])X[H]";
# down "(S[L]W[L])X[H](W[H])";
# down "(S[L]W[L])X[H](W[H]W[H])";
# down "(S[L]W[L])X[H](W[L]S[L])(S[H])";
# down "(S[L]W[L])X[H](W[L]S[H])(S[H])";
# down "X[H](S[L]W[L])X[H](W[L]S[L])(S[H])";

######################################
#### DEFINE RHYTHM TYPE = TROCHEE ####
######################################

echo << RhythmType=Trochee >> 

# Zuraw et al. 2014 definition: A foot must have stress on its initial
# mora, and its initial mora only (we assume that in a stressed long
# vowel the stress belongs to the first mora)

# In a footed H (i.e. not X[H], but S|W[H]), allow only (S[H]), and
# not (W[H])
# In a footed LL, allow only (S[L]W[L]), and not (W[L]W[L]),
# (W[L]S[L]) or (S[L]S[L])
#! Note if I had used moras as atomic symbols, I could refer to them
#! here, instead of referring separately to Hs and Ls
#! Here I made the choice to not assume feet are binary and made the
#! constraint as general as possible, so for instance, allows (W[H]W[L])(S[L])
#! Only restricts initial L in a foot, non-initial L in a foot and H feet

# Define subrule for H syllables
# use of => restriction operator

# any occurrence of "[H])" (a footed heavy) must be preceded by "(S" or "(P"

define Stressed [ "S" | "P" ];

define RhTypeTrocheeH [ [ Heavy ")" ] => "(" Stressed _ ];


# Try:
push RhTypeTrocheeH;
down "S[H]";
down "(S[H])";
down "(P[H])";
down "(W[H])";
down "(S[H])(S[H])";
down "(S[H])(W[H])";
down "(S[H])ABCD";
down "(S[H])(W[L])";

# Define subrule for LL feet
# The first L in a foot must be strong, and all non-intial Ls in a
# foot must be weak, a light can also be unparsed
# Don't enforce foot binarity!

define RhTypeTrocheeLL [ "[" "L" => "(" Stressed _ , "]" "W" _ , "X" _ ] ;

# Try:
# push RhTypeTrocheeLL;
# down "X[L]";
# down "(S[H])";
# down "(S[L])";
# down "(W[L])";
# down "(S[L])(S[L])";
# down "(S[L]S[L])";
# down "(S[L]W[L])";
# down "(W[L]W[L])";
# down "(W[L]S[L])";
# down "(W[L]P[L])";
# down "(S[L]W[L]W[L])";
# down "(P[L]W[L]W[L])";
# down "(P[L]W[L]X[L])";
# down "(S[L]W[L]W[L]S[L])";
# down "(S[L]S[H])"; 

# define entire RhTypeTrochee rule

define RhTypeTrochee [ RhTypeTrocheeH & RhTypeTrocheeLL ];

# Try:
#push RhTypeTrochee;
# down "X[H]";
# down "X[L]";
# down "(S[H])";
# down "S[H]";
# down "(S[L])";
# down "(W[L])";
# down "(W[H])";
# down "(S[L])(S[L])";
# down "(S[L]S[L])";
# down "(S[L]W[L])";
# down "(W[L]W[L])";
# down "(W[L]S[L])";
# down "(S[L]W[L]W[L])";
# down "(S[L]W[L]W[L]S[L])";
# down "(S[L]S[H])"; 
# down "(S[L]W[H])"; 
# down "(S[L]W[L])X[H]"; 
# down "(S[L]W[L])X[L]"; 
# down "(S[L]W[L])S[H]"; 
# down "(S[L]W[L])(S[H])"; 
# down "(S[L]W[L]W[L])X[L]"; 
# down "X[L](S[L]W[L]W[L])"; 
# down "X[H](S[L]W[L]W[L])"; 
# down "X[L](W[L]W[L]W[L])"; 
# clear stack;


###########################
#### DEFINE EDGEMOST-R ####
###########################

echo << Define Edgemost-R >> 

# Zuraw et al. 2014 definition: Edgemost(‘Ft, R; Wd, R) (Edgemost-R)
# The end of the prosodic word must coincide with the end of a primary-stressed foot.
#! This is a gradient constraint!
#! The constraint is defined in Prince and Smolensky (2004), page 38 or so?
# #! (24) EDGEMOST position of head foot in word
# The most prominent foot in the word is at the right edge.
# The difference is one of interpretation. We now have the means to deal with gradient or multiple
# violations of the constraint, in terms of a measure of distance from
# the edge, say syllables. Each element that intervenes between the last foot and the edge counts as
# a separate violation. (KY: each element = each syllable, counting
# from right edge of prominent foot?)
# In McCarthy and Prince 1993 GAT, it's (35), Align-head, Align(PWd,
# Edge, H(PWd), Edge) ,but that switches what comes first and last. 

# Update: treat Edgemost-R as categorical (see 20150305.md)
# 1. We can say Edgemost-R is actually categorical, not gradient. KZ
#    definition "The end of the prosodic word must coincide with the end
#    of a primary-stressed foot."

# For monomorphs, we don't refer to prosodic word, but to the right
# edge of the input string. So this means that the input string must
# end with a primary-stressed foot.

# Note that this could mean either ending in a P[H] or in a P[L]W[L],
# in either case, we have (....P....) at the end of the string.

# We penalize if primary stress is not in the final foot, by
# restricting primary stress to fall in the final foot.
# So primary cannot be followed by a "(", and any following ")" must
# be string terminal.
# Prefix of Primary must contain a "(" not followed by a ")"
# Suffix of Primary may not contain a "(" or a non-terminal ")"
# Suffix of Primary must contain a [ ")" .#. ]


define Foot ["(" [\[ "(" | ")" ]]*  ")"];
define PrimaryFoot [ Foot & $["P"] ];
define EdgemostR [ \P* PrimaryFoot];  

# Try:
# push EdgemostR;
# down "()P[H]";
# down "(P[H]";
# down "P[H])";
# down "P[H]";
# down "(P[H])";
# down "(P[H])X[L]";
# down "(P[H]sdfsdfsdfsdfsd)";
# down "(abdcdsfsdfsdfdP[H])";
# down "(abdcdsfsdfsdfdP[H]sdfdfdfdfd)";
# down "(P[L]P[H])"
# down "P[L]W[L]";
# down "(P[L]W[L])";
# down "P[L](P[L]W[L])";
# down "(P[L])(P[L]W[L])";
# down "(W[L]P[L])";
# down "(W[L]P[L])(S[H])";
# down "(W[L]P[L]))";


###############################
#### DEFINE PARSE SYLLABLE ####
###############################

echo << Define Parse-Syllable >> 

# Zuraw et al. 2014 definition: (Prince & Smolensky 1993), (12b)
# Every syllable must be included in a foot.
#! This is a gradient constraint!
# Just count up the number of Xs

# Define family of Parse constraints, almost identical to Karttunen
#1998 (except no left brackets)

# Careful to have ~ scope over $[]!! Typo in Karttunen 1998

define ParseSyll ~[$"X"] ;
define ParseSyll1 ~[[$"X"]^>1] ;
define ParseSyll2 ~[[$"X"]^>2] ;
define ParseSyll3 ~[[$"X"]^>3] ;
define ParseSyll4 ~[[$"X"]^>4] ;
define ParseSyll5 ~[[$"X"]^>5] ;
define ParseSyll6 ~[[$"X"]^>6] ;
define ParseSyll7 ~[[$"X"]^>7] ;

# Try:
# push ParseSyll;
# down X[L];
# down X[L]X[H];
# down X[H](S[H]);
# down (S[L]W[L]);
# down X[L](S[L]W[L]);
# down (S[L]X[H]W[L]);
# down (S[L][H]W[L]);
# down (S[L]W[H])X[H];
# down X[L](S[H]W[L])X[H];


# Try:
# push ParseSyll1;
# down X[L];
# down X[L]X[H];
# down (S[L]W[L]);
# down X[L](S[L]W[L]);
# down (S[L]X[H]W[L]);
# down (S[L][H]W[L]);
# down (S[L]W[H])X[H];
# down X[L](S[H]W[L])X[H];

# Try:
# push ParseSyll2;
# down X[L];
# down X[L]X[H];
# down X[L]X[H]X[L];
# down (S[L]W[L]);
# down X[L](S[L]W[L]);
# down (S[L]X[H]W[L]);
# down (S[L][H]W[L]);
# down (S[L]W[H])X[H];
# down X[L](S[H]W[L])X[H];
# down X[L](S[H]X[L]W[L])X[H];

# Try:
# push ParseSyll3;
# down X[L];
# down X[L]X[H];
# down X[L]X[H]X[L];
# down X[L]X[H]X[L]X[H];
# down (S[L]W[L]);
# down X[L](S[L]W[L]);
# down (S[L]X[H]W[L]);
# down (S[L][H]W[L]);
# down (S[L]W[H])X[H];
# down X[L](S[H]W[L])X[H]X[L];
# down X[L](S[H]X[L]W[L]X[L])X[H];
# down X[L](S[H]X[L]W[L])X[H]X[L];



### Align(PWd,L;Ft,L)

# Definition: beginning of PWd must coincide with beginning of foot.
# Change to "beginning of input string must coincide with beginning of foot"

define AlignWdLFtL ["(" ?*];

#Test:
# push AlignWdLFtL;
# down "(sdfdsfs)()()()";
# down "sdfdsfs)()()()";
# down "s(dfdsfs)()()()";


############################################
####  NULL OUTPUTS ###
############################################

echo << Define maps of HL-final and lone Ls to Null output >> 

# Replace string-terminal Heavy ? ? ?  Light ( ")" ) with Null if
#sequence is string-final.  The ??? allows for a possible )W( for foot
#boundaries and a stress mark

# Change multicharacter "Null" to "N u l l}

define NullFinHL [  [?* Heavy [?]^<4 Light (")") ] ->@ {Null} || _ .#. ];

# define Test [ GenFt .O. NullFinHL ];
# push Test;
# down HL;
# down HHHHL;
# down HLHL;
# down HLH;

# Any (optionally footed) light syllable that is not preceded or
#followed by anything is mapped to Null

define NullLoneL [ [ ("(") ? Light (")") ] -> {Null} || .#.  _ .#. ];

# define Test [ GenFt .O. NullLoneL ];
# push Test;
# down L;
# down LL;
